Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Revisions and reviews required. (a) The commissioner of education must revise the state's academic standards and graduation requirements and implement a ten-year cycle to review and, consistent with the review, revise state academic standards and related benchmarks, consistent with this subdivision. During each ten-year review and revision cycle, the commissioner also must examine the alignment of each required academic standard and related benchmark with the knowledge and skills students need for career and college readiness and advanced work in the particular subject area. The commissioner must include the contributions of Minnesota American Indian Tribes and communities, including urban Indigenous communities, as related to the academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards. The commissioner must embed Indigenous education for all students consistent with recommendations from Tribal Nations and urban Indigenous communities in Minnesota regarding the contributions of American Indian Tribes and communities in Minnesota into the state's academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards. The recommendations to embed Indigenous education for all students includes but is not limited to American Indian experiences in Minnesota, including Tribal histories, Indigenous languages, sovereignty issues, cultures, treaty rights, governments, socioeconomic experiences, contemporary issues, and current events. (b) The commissioner must ensure that the statewide mathematics assessments administered to students in grades 3 through 8 and 11 are aligned with the state academic standards in mathematics, consistent with section 120B.302, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in mathematics beginning in the 2021-2022 school year and every ten years thereafter. (c) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in arts beginning in the 2017-2018 school year and every ten years thereafter. (d) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in science beginning in the 2018-2019 school year and every ten years thereafter. (e) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in language arts beginning in the 2019-2020 school year and every ten years thereafter. (f) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in social studies beginning in the 2020-2021 school year and every ten years thereafter.new text begin During the review and revision of the social studies academic standards, the commissioner must include the contributions of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender people, and people with disabilities in the history of this country and this state.new text end (g) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in physical education beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and every ten years thereafter. (h) The commissioner must implement a review of the academic standards and related benchmarks in health education beginning in the 2034-2035 school year and every ten years thereafter. (i) School districts and charter schools must revise and align local academic standards and high school graduation requirements in world languages and career and technical education to require students to complete the revised standards beginning in a school year determined by the school district or charter school. School districts and charter schools must formally establish a periodic review cycle for the academic standards and related benchmarks in world languages and career and technical education. (j) The commissioner of education must embed technology and information literacy standards consistent with recommendations from school media specialists into the state's academic standards and graduation requirements. (k) The commissioner of education must embed ethnic studies as related to the academic standards during the review and revision of the required academic standards.